Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Service System

33-5-101. Application of title to persons with developmental disabilities.

Services to persons with developmental disabilities are governed generally by this title, including chapters 1-4, 7, 8 and 9.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-5-102. Effective date of part.

Persons with developmental disabilities based on conditions other than an intellectual disability are eligible for direct service under this part on March 1, 2002. Persons with an intellectual disability are eligible for direct service under this part on March 1, 2001.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-5-103. Persons with developmental disability based solely on mental illness or serious emotional disturbance.

If a person has a developmental disability solely on the basis of having a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, the person is not eligible to have services or supports provided for the developmental disability primarily under this chapter.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-104. Developmental disabilities occurring after twenty-two years of age.

Within the limits of available services, the department may serve persons who have conditions that would constitute a developmental disability except that the disability occurred after twenty-two (22) years of age.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-105. Factors in assessing eligibility for service and support under this chapter.

A person is eligible for service and support under this chapter on the basis of an intellectual disability only if the assessment that the person has an intellectual disability takes into account:

Cultural and linguistic diversity as well as differences in communication and behavioral factors;

Whether the person's limitations in adaptive skills occur in the context of community environments typical of the person's age peers and is indexed to the person's individualized needs for supports;

Specific adaptive limitations often coexist with strengths in other adaptive skills or other personal capabilities; and

With appropriate supports over a sustained period, the life functioning of a person with an intellectual disability will generally improve.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-5-106. Application process.

A person with a developmental disability, a parent or legal guardian of a child with a developmental disability, a conservator of a person with a developmental disability, the department of children's services on behalf of a person in its legal custody who has a developmental disability, or the department of human services on behalf of a person in its legal custody who has a developmental disability, referred to as the applicant, may apply to the department through its designated entities for services and supports that they provide directly or by contract. The designated entity shall inform the applicant about all options for services and supports. When services and supports appropriate for the applicant are not available, the designated entity shall notify the applicant in writing of the basis on which the decision was made, possible service options, the prospects for obtaining service, and the time estimated before the service may be available. The applicant shall be notified periodically and in a timely manner of the status of the application. Based upon additional information, change in status may be determined by the designated entity.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-501; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-5-101(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 25.

Cross-References. Family support programs and services, title 33, ch. 5, part 2.

33-5-107. Types of services available.

If, and only if, no suitable alternative provider is available, the chief officer of a department facility may authorize nonresidential services and supports of the developmental center to persons with developmental disabilities. A person with a developmental disability, a parent or legal guardian of a child with a developmental disability, or the conservator of a person with a developmental disability may request nonresidential services and supports. The chief officer may, in the best interests of the person, discontinue the nonresidential services and supports of a person at any time.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-501; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-5-101(b)(4); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Genetic testing for the prevention and treatment of mental retardation, title 68, ch. 5, part 5.

Newborn testing for metabolic defects that would result in mental retardation, title 68, ch. 5, part 4.

Voluntary hospitalization, release, § 33-6-201 et seq.

Collateral References.

Liability of one releasing institutionalized mental patient for harm he causes. 38 A.L.R.3d 699.

33-5-108. Determination of fiscal impact on licensees following regulatory or policy changes — Notice.

As used in this section, “fiscal impact” means any increase, decrease, or other change in revenue, expenditures, or fiscal liability. The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall assess in writing the fiscal impact on licensees under chapter 2, part 4 of this title, of any change to any rule, regulation, policy or guideline relating to the staffing, physical plant or operating procedures of the licensee for rendering services pursuant to a contract, grant or agreement with the department. Unless exigent circumstances require the change to be implemented sooner, no less than thirty (30) days before the change in the rule, regulation, policy or guideline is to take effect, the department's estimate of fiscal impact shall be transmitted by the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities to the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives, the finance, ways and means committee of the senate and the comptroller of the treasury for any appropriate review. If exigent circumstances, such as an unforeseen court order, require a change to be implemented sooner, then the department's statement describing the exigent circumstances that prevented thirty (30) days' notice shall be provided to the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives, the finance, ways and means committee of the senate and the comptroller of the treasury not later than five (5) days after implementing the change. In that case the department shall provide the estimate of fiscal impact to the entities above within sixty (60) days after implementing the change.

Acts 2001, ch. 137, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 26; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 41; 2016, ch. 797, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 137, § 2, provided that this section shall apply to any change to any rule, regulation, policy or guideline relating to the staffing, physical plant or operating procedures of such licensee for rendering services pursuant to a contract, grant or agreement with the division for mental retardation services (now department of developmental disabilities) occurring on and after March 1, 2001. Additionally, it is the “clear and unequivocal intent” of the general assembly that this section has retroactive application to March 1, 2001.

Acts 2009, ch. 477, § 1, directed the code commission to change all references from “division of mental retardation services” to “division of intellectual disabilities services” (now department of intellectual and developmental disabilities) and to include the changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 797, § 19. April 14, 2016.

33-5-109. Study of issues relating to services provided to persons with developmental disabilities, intellectual disabilities
and other disabilities.

There is created a special joint committee to study the issues relating to services provided to persons with developmental disabilities, intellectual disability and other disabilities. This study shall include, but not be limited to:

A review of the different agencies in state government providing services;

The structure and location of state services to persons with developmental disabilities, intellectual disability and other disabilities;

The efficiency of providing services to persons with disabilities and costs associated with providing services;

An evaluation of the cost of the division of intellectual disabilities services (DIDS) waiting list and the means to reduce or eliminate it; and

A look at the cost structure of services in DIDS and evaluation of differences in cost.

The special joint committee shall consist of:

Four (4) members of the senate, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate; and

Four (4) members of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

All appropriate agencies of state government shall provide assistance to the special joint committee upon request of the chair.

All legislative members of the special joint committee who are duly elected members of the general assembly shall remain members of the committee until the committee reports its final findings and recommendations.

The special joint committee shall be convened by the member having the greatest number of years of continuous service within the general assembly, and at its first meeting shall elect from among its legislative membership a chair, vice-chair, and other officers the committee deems necessary.

The special joint committee shall timely report its final findings and recommendations to the One Hundred Sixth General Assembly no later than February 1, 2010.

Acts 2008, ch. 1157, §§ 1-6; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding a study of issues relating to services provided to persons with developmental disabilities, mental retardation and other disabilities, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1157.

Acts 2009, ch. 477, § 1, directed the code commission to change all references from “division of mental retardation services” to “division of intellectual disabilities services” (now department of intellectual and developmental disabilities) and to include the changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

The division of intellectual disabilities services (DIDS), referred to in this section, was replaced by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities by Acts 2010, ch. 1100, effective January 15, 2011.

33-5-110. Residential and day provider agencies task force.

The speakers of the senate and house of representatives shall jointly appoint a twenty-five-person task force to review the regulations of the residential and day provider agencies contracted by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities (DIDD) and make initial recommendations with regard to relieving expensive and unnecessary regulations on such providers to the general assembly and governor by January 1, 2011. The task force shall subsequently make annual reports to the governor and the general assembly by January 1 of each year thereafter.

Eleven (11) of the members of the task force shall be appointed from a list of persons provided by DIDD's service providers. Eight (8) members shall be appointed from DIDD, at least one (1) of whom shall be an assistant commissioner with the department. One (1) member shall be an assistant commissioner with the bureau of TennCare, and one (1) member shall be appointed from the department office of licensure. Four (4) members shall be appointed from the DIDD advisory council, or its successor body.

The speakers of the senate and house of representatives shall jointly designate two (2) of the members to serve as co-chairs of the task force. One (1) co-chair shall be a DIDD service provider, and one (1) co-chair shall be a DIDD staff person.

The task force created by this section shall assume the duties and responsibilities of the regulatory relief board.

Members of the task force shall serve without compensation. The task force shall complete its appointed duties and make its final report to the governor and the general assembly by June 30, 2014, at which time the task force shall cease to exist.

Acts 2010, ch. 808, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 24; 2011, ch. 158, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

33-5-111. Eligibility criteria for medical assistance programs and services.

Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, eligibility criteria for medical assistance programs and services pursuant to title 71, chapter 5, for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities shall be established by the bureau of TennCare, and set forth in the medicaid state plan, federal waivers, or in rules promulgated by the bureau of TennCare, and shall be subject to the availability of funding in each year's general appropriations act.

Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, eligibility criteria for state-funded programs and services for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities shall be established by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities and set forth in department rules, and shall be subject to the availability of funding in each year's general appropriations act.

Acts 2011, ch. 158, § 45.

33-5-112. Person on waiting list for services to be enrolled in community based services program within six months of custodial parent or caregiver attaining certain age.

An eligible person with an intellectual disability who is on the referral list for services and whose older custodial parent, or custodial caregiver, attains seventy-five (75) years of age shall be enrolled in employment and community first choices Group 5 or a similarly capped home and community based services program within six (6) months of the person's parent or caregiver attaining that age.

An eligible person with a developmental disability other than an intellectual disability who is on the referral list for services and whose older custodial parent, or custodial caregiver, attains eighty (80) years of age shall be enrolled in employment and community first choices Group 5 or a similarly capped home and community based services program within six (6) months of the person's parent or caregiver attaining that age.

Acts 2015, ch. 430, § 1; 2016, ch. 707, § 1; 2018, ch. 986, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need for changes to the administration of waiting lists for persons with intellectual disabilities to receive services, see Acts 2015, ch. 430.

For the Preamble to the act concerning services and supports for people with disabilities, see Acts 2018, ch. 986.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “attains seventy-five (75) years of age” for “attains eighty (80) years of age”.

The 2018 amendment added (b); and, in present (a), substituted “An eligible” for “A” at the beginning, “referral” for “waiting” preceding “list”, employment and community first choices Group S” for “the self-determination waiver” following “enrolled in”, and “home and community based services program” for “medical assistance waiver” preceding “within”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 430, § 2. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 707, § 2, April 6, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 986, § 2. May 21, 2018.